Virginia statutes. Title 29.1. Wildlife, Inland Fisheries and Boating.
Article 2. National Forests.

§ 29.1-408.
Permit required; exceptions.

No person shall hunt, fish, or trap on any lands in the national forests in this Commonwealth without first obtaining, in addition to the regular resident or nonresident license, a special permit to hunt, fish, or trap on such areas in the national forests as the Board and the Forest Service may agree upon. However, no such permit shall be required of (i) residents under the age of 16 to fish or trap; (ii) residents over the age of 65 to fish; (iii) nonresidents under the age of 16 to fish when accompanied by a person possessing a valid license to fish therein; (iv) residents possessing a license as provided by subsection E of §

29.1-301

; and (v) persons holding a license as provided by §

29.1-339

.

The violation of any of the terms of this article shall constitute a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-117; 1972, c. 381; 1977, c. 377; 1987, c. 488; 2018, c. 507.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 507 substituted “16 to fish” for “twelve to fish, except for trout” in clause (iii); and made stylistic changes.

§ 29.1-409.
From whom permits obtained; fee.

The special national forest permit may be obtained from the clerk or agent of any county or city whose duty it is to sell hunting, fishing, and trapping licenses. The fee for the special permit shall be three dollars.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-118; 1980, c. 494; 1987, c. 488; 1988, c. 250.

§ 29.1-410.
Disposition of funds.

The funds derived from the sale of the special permits shall be used by the Director for game and fish management purposes within the national forests in this Commonwealth, or, in the discretion of the Board, shall be paid into the United States treasury as a cooperative deposit for use of the United States Forest Service for game and fish management purposes within the national forests in Virginia.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-119; 1987, c. 488.

§ 29.1-411.
Cooperative agreement.

The Board shall enter into a cooperative agreement with the United States Forest Service. The cooperative agreement shall define the means and methods to be taken to improve the fish and game resources of the national forests of this Commonwealth and shall program the expenditure of all funds derived from the special permit.

History.

Code 1950, § 29-120; 1987, c. 488.